Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2236
Constables and sheriffs; return of not found; when made.

No officer shall make a return on any process of "not found" as to any defendant, unless he shall have been once at least to the usual place of residence of the defendant, if such defendant has any in the jurisdiction of the court.

Laws 1929, c. 82, art. XV, § 175, p. 324;

C.S.1929, § 22-1505;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,176;

R.S.1943, (1979), § 26-1,176;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-599.